Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1028.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Small Business Road Construction Mitigation Grant Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Construction mitigation zone." A geographic area with a high concentration of qualified businesses that are designated by the department as being impacted by a public utility road construction project."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth.123456789101112131415161718 "Program." The Small Business Road Construction Mitigation Grant Program established under section 3."Public utility road construction project." A road construction project conducted by a public utility, which occurs for a period of more than 90 days."Qualified business." An entity that is engaged in a for-profit business enterprise, employs no more than 10 full-time or part-time employees and is located in a construction mitigation zone.Section 3. Establishment of program.The Small Business Road Construction Mitigation Grant Program is established within the department. The department shall award grants under the program to qualified businesses for the purpose of maintaining each qualified business within a construction mitigation zone.Section 4. Application.(a) Application.--The department shall develop an application form and a process for awarding grants under the program. In order to apply for a grant under the program, a qualified business shall use the application form developed by the department and submit the application in a manner specified by the department.(b) Eligibility.--In order to be eligible for a grant under the program, a qualified business shall demonstrate in the application submitted under subsection (a) that the qualified business experienced a significant decline in revenue, including the time period when the public utility road construction project contributed to the significant decline in revenue, in a manner specified by the department. The department shall, upon request, assist a qualified business in preparing the 20250HB1028PN1104 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 documentation necessary to demonstrate that the qualified business experienced a significant decline in revenue as required under this subsection.Section 5. Award of grants.The department shall prioritize the award of each grant under the program on a case-by-case basis using all of the following criteria:(1) Rate of decline in revenue.(2) Duration of public utility road construction project.(3) Proximity to public utility road construction project.(4) Severity of traffic disruption.(5) Lack of access to parking.(6) Lack of access for pedestrian traffic.(7) Any other relevant criteria as determined by the department.Section 6. Penalty.If a qualified business knowingly submits false or fraudulent documentation to the department for the purpose of receiving a grant under the program, the department may impose a penalty on the qualified business for an amount equal to two times the amount of the grant received. The penalty shall be payable in one lump sum or in installments, with or without interest, as the department deems appropriate. The provisions of 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 (relating to practice and procedure) and 7 (relating to judicial review) shall apply to this section.Section 7. Limitations.The department may not award a grant under the program to a qualified business in excess of the decline in revenue 20250HB1028PN1104 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 demonstrated by the qualified business under section 4(b) or $15,000 per calendar year, whichever is less.Section 8. Report.(a) Annual report.--No later than September 1, 2026, and each September 1 thereafter, the department shall post an annual report regarding the program on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. The annual report shall include the following information:(1) The name and address of each qualified business that received a grant under the program.(2) The amount awarded to each qualified business that received a grant under the program.(3) The name and contact information of each public utility that has impacted a qualified business within a construction mitigation zone.(b) Submission.--The department shall submit the annual report under subsection (a) to all of the following:(1) The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Community, Economic and Recreational Development Committee of the Senate.(5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Commerce Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 9. Guidelines.Within 180 days of the effective date of this section, the department shall develop written guidelines for the 20250HB1028PN1104 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administration of the program.Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1028PN1104 - 5 - 123